Maine, session 132, LD91.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 5 MRSA §285, sub-§1, ¶L, as amended by PL 2023, c. 20, §2, is further
amended to read:
L. Any employee of an academy approved for tuition purposes in accordance with
Title 20‑A, sections 2951 to 2955; and
Sec. 2. 5 MRSA §285, sub-§1, ¶M, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 20, §3, is amended
to read:
M. A retired county or municipal law enforcement officer or retired municipal
firefighter who meets the requirements for coverage under subsection 11‑A.; and
Sec. 3. 5 MRSA §285, sub-§1, ¶N is enacted to read:
N. Any employee of the Maine Association of Retirees or its successor organization.